Utah statutes.
73-4-6.   In case of use for irrigation.
If the water claimed to have been appropriated is used for irrigation, the
statement shall show, in addition to the facts required by Section 73-4-5, as
nearly as possible the area of land irrigated the first year and each
subsequent year; the total area irrigated at the time of filing and its
location in each section, township and range wherein it is situated; the
character and depth of the soil, the kind of crops raised and the maximum and
minimum acreage irrigated during the total period of use.
